Maine, session 132, LD1627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4722, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Internship. Beginning January 1, 2027, before graduating from high school a
student must complete an internship, apprenticeship or cooperative education experience
that allows the student to attain workforce skills.
Sec. 2. Department of Education to develop career pathway awareness
initiative. The Department of Education shall develop and implement a career exploration
module for middle school and high school students that emphasizes the State's
high-demand fields as identified by the department. The initiative must include digital and
classroom-based resources and provide opportunities for students to engage with private
sector employers. The department shall develop a means to fund this initiative by
repurposing existing underperforming career readiness programs.
Sec. 3. Department of Education to require accountability for post-
graduation outcomes. The Department of Education shall require school administrative
units to track and report post-graduation data and outcomes, including employment of
Maine graduates in high-demand fields; enrollment in apprenticeships, technical schools
or certification programs; and retention rates for students attending 4-year postsecondary
education institutions. The department shall examine metrics that incentivize school
administrative units to guide students toward 4-year degree programs and develop
measures that incentivize placement in stable employment aligned with workforce needs
and enrollment in programs with high completion rates and career outcomes. The
department shall develop a method for school administrative units to submit to the
department annually a report detailing the percentage of graduates entering postsecondary
education institutions, technical schools or the workforce and retention rates for graduates
in postsecondary education institutions.
Sec. 4. Department of Education to provide training on career counseling
standards. The Department of Education shall provide professional development for
school counselors regarding career pathways in high-demand fields and workforce trends
and local employment opportunities.
Sec. 5. Department of Education to remove incentives for school
administrative units. The Department of Education shall remove incentives for school
administrative units that disproportionately steer students toward 4-year postsecondary
education institutions.
Sec. 6. Department of Education to mandate information on post-
graduation options. The Department of Education shall mandate that all high school
students receive information on a variety of post-graduation options, including
apprenticeships, certification programs and local employment opportunities in high
demand.
Sec. 7. Department of Education to redirect infrastructure funds. The
Department of Education shall redirect infrastructure funds to upgrade career and technical
education facilities and equipment to meet industry standards.
Page 1 - 132LR2091(01)

Sec. 8. Department of Education to strengthen and expand extended
learning opportunity programs. The Department of Education shall expand access to
extended learning opportunity program coordinators and prioritize underserved and rural
areas. The department shall provide support for extended learning opportunity program
coordinators to recruit local employers with tools and recognition programs for business
participation. The department shall align extended learning opportunity program activities
with the State's high-demand fields and workforce needs.
Sec. 9. Department of Education to establish grant programs. The
department shall establish a competitive grant program for employers to partner with
schools, career and technical education centers and the Maine Community College System
to create new training opportunities to address workforce gaps. The grant program must
require employers to co-invest through matching funds or in-kind contributions. The
department shall fund innovative pilot programs such as mobile training units or so-called
earn while you learn models for high school students that focus on measurable outcomes.
Sec. 10. Department of Education to coordinate with Department of
Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services to develop
employer tax incentives for workforce investments. The Department of Education
shall coordinate with the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Bureau of
Revenue Services to develop employer tax incentives for workforce investments. The
Department of Education and the bureau shall develop the following tax incentives:
1. A student loan assistance tax credit through which employers offering student loan
repayment assistance to Maine-based employees receive a state income tax credit equal to
50% of contributions capped at $2,500 per employee annually. The assistance must reduce
employees' principal or interest on student loans and be conditioned upon a 2-year retention
agreement;
2. A child care support tax credit through which employers that provide on-site child
care or subsidies for employees receive a state income tax credit equal to 30% of child care
program costs, capped at $10,000 per facility or $2,000 per employee annually, whichever
is less;
3. A cultural and recreational investment tax credit through which employers that
contribute to local amenities, such as parks, community centers and recreational facilities,
receive a credit equal to 25% of direct contributions made by the employer, capped at
$25,000 annually. The contributions must benefit the broader community and align with
regional workforce needs; and
4. A "stay and grow" tax credit that provides a graduated income tax credit for a person
employed in a high-demand field and who remains in the State for at least 5 years. The
credit must increase over time to reward longer commitments and must prioritize
employment in designated industries or in rural areas facing workforce shortages.
Sec. 11. Department of Education and Department of Labor to coordinate
and offer stipends for employees in underserved regions. The Department of
Education and the Department of Labor shall coordinate and address labor shortages in
underserved regions of the State by offering temporary housing and commuting or
relocation stipends for workers who take jobs in the State's rural areas. The benefits and
stipends must last for a period of up to 3 years and taper off gradually. The Department of
Page 2 - 132LR2091(01)

415 Education and the Department of Labor shall fund the grants by reallocating rural
426 development grants.
Sec. 12. Department of Education to conduct efficiency and oversight of
workforce education. The Department of Education shall conduct audits of workforce
education to identify inefficient programs. Upon the discovery of inefficient programs, the
department shall reallocate the savings to initiatives with measurable outcomes. The
department shall coordinate funding and incentives used by the department to metrics such
as job placements, retention rates and workforce satisfaction. The department shall
establish a committee to evaluate program effectiveness and recommend annual
adjustments.
Sec. 13. Report. The Department of Education shall submit a report to the Joint
Standing Committee on Education and Cultural Affairs detailing its progress on this
legislation no later than December 3, 2025. The report must include suggested legislation
to implement the initiatives under this legislation. The Joint Standing Committee on
Education and Cultural Affairs may report out legislation related to the report to the Second
Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.